California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) The Santa Ana River region is home to one of the fastest growing populations in the nation, which is expected to grow from its current five million residents to ten million residents by 2050.

(c) Not all Orange County residents have equal access to green space. The communities with the worst access to parks lie along the
 river in north Orange County, with low-income levels and high concentrations of people of color.

(d) Despite vast areas of parkland in the region, many communities in San Bernardino and Riverside Counties are park poor, with less than three acres of green space per 1,000 residents. This is particularly true in the communities that were built out before the development boom of the past few decades. As more working class families moved to the area in search of jobs, the population in these older neighborhoods swelled but public resources for parks and recreation were not invested proportionally to the growth.

(e) The Santa Ana River is an extraordinary natural resource of statewide significance. The river has been subject to intense development and is in need of restoration,
 conservation, and enhancement.

(f) The establishment of the Santa Ana River Conservancy Program will provide the state with the necessary structure to plan and implement restoration and preservation projects and recreation opportunities, and enhance the overall condition of the Santa Ana River.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31172.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Program” means the Santa Ana River Conservancy Program.

(b) “Program lands” means interests in real property acquired, managed, or subject to a project under this chapter.

(c) “Santa Ana River region” means those lands that are located within one-half mile on either side of the riverbed of the Santa Ana River, or any of its tributaries, from its headwaters near the San Gorgonio Wilderness Area to the Pacific Ocean at the Santa Ana River Mouth Beach in Huntington Beach and adjacent watersheds
 and lands as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 31175.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31173.

The conservancy may undertake projects and award grants and loans to public agencies and nonprofit organizations to help achieve all of the following goals of the program:

(a) Recreational opportunities, open space, trails, wildlife habitat and species restoration, enhancement, and protection, wetland restoration and protection, agricultural land restoration and protection, protection and maintenance of the quality of the waters in the Santa Ana River for all beneficial uses, related educational use, and natural floodwater conveyance.

(b) Public access to, enjoyment of, and enhancement of recreational and educational
 experience on, program lands in a manner consistent with the protection of land and natural resources and economic resources in the area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31174.

In administering the program, the conservancy shall, consistent with the purposes of this chapter, do all of the following:

(a) Create an advisory group to offer advice, expertise, support, or service to the conservancy, without compensation. The advisory group may be comprised of members of the environmental community, local government, local agencies, and public and private representatives, who are all involved in projects consistent with the goals of this program pursuant to Section 31173.

(b) Prepare a Santa Ana River Parkway and Open Space Plan that shall, at
 minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Determine the policies and priorities for conserving the Santa Ana River and its watershed.

(2) Identify underused, existing public open spaces and recommend ways to provide better public use and enjoyment in
 those areas.

(3) Identify and prioritize additional low-impact recreational and open-space needs, including additional or upgraded facilities and parks that may be necessary or desirable.

(c) Give priority to river-related projects that create expanded opportunities for recreation, greening, aesthetic improvement, and wildlife habitat along the corridor of the river and in parts of the river channel that can be improved without infringing on water quality, water supply, and necessary flood control.

(d) Implement the program in conformance with all related general and specific plans and zoning regulations of local agencies within the Santa Ana River region.

(e) Provide for program lands and facilities to be operated and maintained in accordance with the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31175.

In carrying out the purposes of this chapter, and without limiting the express or implied powers of the conservancy in implementing other provisions of this division, the conservancy shall have, and may exercise, all necessary rights and powers, expressed or implied, except as otherwise provided in this chapter. Without limitation, the conservancy may do all of the following:

(a) (1) Acquire interests and options in real property and make acquisition grants for these purposes.

(2) With respect to real property acquisitions by the conservancy of watersheds and lands that are within the Santa Ana River region but
 not within one-half mile on either side of the riverbed of the
 Santa Ana River, the conservancy shall provide to the city or county with geographic jurisdiction over the affected real property 30 days’ written notice of the conservancy’s intent, unless the city or county agrees to accept less notice in a given case.

(b) Exercise a right of first refusal, to the extent not in conflict with another law, for surplus public agency property located within the Santa Ana River region, consistent with the Santa Ana River Parkway and Open Space Plan, adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 31174.

(c) Lease, rent, sell, exchange, or transfer interests in real property.

(d) (1) Undertake or fund projects to implement site improvements, upgrade
 deteriorating facilities or construct new facilities for outdoor recreation, public access, nature appreciation and interpretation; historic and cultural preservation; or protection, restoration, or enhancement of natural resources and habitat.

(2) If the conservancy intends to undertake a project directly, the conservancy shall provide 30 days’ written notice to the city or county with geographic jurisdiction over the affected real property, unless the city or county agrees to accept less notice in a given case.

(e) Provide for the management of program lands.

(f) Fix and collect fees for the use of any land owned or controlled, or for any service provided, by the conservancy. The amount of the fees shall not exceed the
 reasonable cost of maintaining and operating the land or providing the services rendered by the conservancy.

(g) The conservancy may apply for and accept grants, gifts, donations of money and property, subventions, rents, royalties, and other assistance from public and private sources. These funds shall be deposited in the Santa Ana River Conservancy Program Account, as specified in Section 31179, for use in furthering the program.

(h) Recruit and coordinate volunteers and experts to conduct interpretive and recreational programs, and assist with construction projects and the maintenance of facilities.

(i) Enter into contracts and joint powers agreements.

(j) Sue and be sued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31176.

(a) The conservancy shall, as necessary and appropriate, cooperate and consult with a public water or wastewater system before the conservancy acquires an interest in real property, or awards a grant, that affects facilities and appurtenant land owned or operated by the public water or wastewater system. 

(b) The conservancy shall, as necessary and appropriate, cooperate and consult with the department before the conservancy acquires an interest in real property, or awards a
 grant, that affects facilities and appurtenant land owned or operated by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31177.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 31175, the conservancy is subject to all laws, regulations, and general and specific plans of the legislative body of the city or county with geographic jurisdiction over the area in which the conservancy proposes to take an action.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 31175, the conservancy shall not do any of the following:

(1) Exercise the power of eminent domain in implementing this chapter.

(2) Manage, regulate, or control the use of any land owned or leased by another public agency, except as provided pursuant to a
 written agreement with that public agency.

(3) Levy a tax.

(4) Take an action that interferes, conflicts with, impedes, adversely impacts or prevents the planning and implementation of transportation projects and programs contained in the regional transportation plan, approved and maintained, from time to time, by the Southern California Association of Governments.

(5) Act to affect any water right or water-resource facility, including any publicly owned water treatment works, in the Santa Ana River region and watershed without the consent of the affected party.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31178.

To the extent feasible, in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, the conservancy shall utilize the services of the California Conservation Corps and Community Conservation Corps, as defined in Section 14507.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31179.

(a) The Santa Ana River Conservancy Program Account is hereby created in the State Coastal Conservancy Fund. Moneys in the account shall accrue interest and be available, upon appropriation, for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) All revenue, including fee revenue received pursuant to this chapter, shall be deposited in the account.

(c) The conservancy shall administer funds appropriated to it for the program and may expend those funds for capital improvements, land acquisition, and support of the program’s operations. The conservancy may also accept money, grants, goods, or services contributed to it by a
 public agency, private entity, or person and, upon receipt, may use the money, grants, goods, or services for capital improvements, land acquisitions, and support of the program’s operations for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

31180.

The conservancy shall include information about the program in its report to the Governor and Legislature pursuant to Section 31108.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (SB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Coastal Restoration Projects [31200. - 31215.]

31200.

The conservancy may award grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the purpose of restoration of areas of the coastal zone that, because of scattered ownerships, poor lot layout, inadequate park and open space, incompatible land uses, or other conditions, are adversely affecting the coastal environment or are impeding orderly development. Grants under this section shall be utilized for the assembly of parcels of land within designated coastal restoration areas, for the redesign of those areas, and the installation of public improvements required to serve those areas. As provided in this chapter, the cost of acquisition of certain coastal access and open-space lands, other than those acquired through dedication, within restoration areas may be funded through the conservancy. Grants under this section may not be utilized as a method of acquisition of public park, recreation, or wildlife areas, except as those uses may be incidental to a coastal restoration project. After redesign and installation of public improvements, if any, lands containing coastal restoration projects, with the exception of lands acquired for public purposes as provided in this chapter, shall be conveyed to any person for the purpose of development in accordance with a restoration plan approved under Section 31208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31201.

All areas proposed for restoration by the conservancy, a local public agency, or a nonprofit organization shall be identified in a certified local coastal plan or program as requiring public action to resolve existing or potential development problems or shall be so identified in other local plans which the commission determines to be consistent with the policies and objectives of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000). In the case of San Francisco Bay, the lands shall be so identified in the bay plan, the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan, or in any other local plan which the bay commission determines to be consistent with such plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 5.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31203.

In reviewing grant applications and restoration plans, the conservancy shall seek to promote excellence of design and shall stimulate projects which exhibit innovation in sensitively integrating man-made features into the natural coastal environment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31204.

The conservancy may provide up to the total cost of any coastal restoration project, including the local share of federally supported projects. The conservancy may also require local funding participation in coastal restoration projects. The amount of funding provided by the conservancy and the degree of local participation shall be determined by the total amount of funding available for coastal restoration projects, the fiscal resources of the applicant, the urgency of the project relative to other eligible coastal restoration projects, the degree to which the project meets the objectives set forth in Section 31203, and the application of other factors prescribed by the conservancy for the purpose of determining project eligibility and priority in order to more effectively carry out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31205.

The conservancy shall request the commission, local public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and other public and private groups to assist in the development of criteria and guidelines for the submission, evaluation, and determination of priority of coastal restoration projects. After considering comments received from such sources and ensuring that adequate opportunity for public review and comment has been provided, the conservancy shall adopt guidelines and criteria for the administration of the coastal program authorized under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 6.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31206.

In accordance with procedures adopted by the conservancy, public agencies and nonprofit organizations may submit proposed coastal restoration projects for consideration by the conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31207.

In connection with proposed coastal restoration projects, the conservancy may fund up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) of the cost of preparing coastal restoration plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31207.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may enter into an option to acquire an interest in real property in connection with a restoration project, when the Legislature appropriates funds for purposes of carrying out the objectives of this division. The cost of the option may not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31208.

(a) Following completion of a coastal restoration plan, the conservancy shall forward the proposed plan to the commission for determination of conformity of the plan with the policies and objectives of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000). The commission shall have 60 days to review the project and transmit the findings on such plan to the conservancy. If no comments are received within that period, the coastal restoration plan shall be deemed to be in accord with Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000).

(b) Following the certification of a local coastal program, the city or county or city and county with jurisdiction over the certified area, rather than the commission, shall review the coastal restoration plan where: (1) the proposed restoration plan will be implemented entirely within one local public agency’s jurisdiction; (2) the area proposed for restoration is identified pursuant to the provisions of Section 31201; and (3) implementation of the coastal restoration plan does not require an amendment to the certified local coastal program. The local public agency shall review the coastal restoration plan to determine consistency with the certified local coastal program within 60 days after transmittal of the plan from the conservancy and shall transmit its findings to the conservancy immediately upon completion of plan review. If no comments are received at the end of the 60-day period, the plan shall be deemed to be in accord with the provisions of the certified local coastal program.

Where the coastal restoration plan will be implemented in whole or in part in an area in which the commission retains coastal development permit jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30519, or in an area in which two or more local governments have coastal development permit jurisdiction, or where a local coastal program amendment is required to implement the plan, the commission shall be responsible for coastal restoration plan review and shall conduct the review in the following manner. The commission shall review the coastal restoration plan for consistency with the policies and objectives of Division 20, as provided in subdivision (a), for an area subject to retained coastal development permit jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30519 and where a local coastal program amendment is required, and shall review the plan for consistency with certified local coastal programs for areas under local government coastal development permit jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 505, Sec. 3.   Effective July 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31208.5.

In the case of San Francisco Bay projects, the conservancy shall forward a proposed coastal restoration plan to the bay commission for determination of conformity with the bay plan, and, where relevant, with the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan. The bay commission shall have 60 days to review the plan and transmit its findings on such plan to the conservancy. If no comments are received within such period, the restoration plan shall be deemed to be in accord with the bay plan and, where relevant, the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

31209.

Following approval of a restoration plan as provided in Section 31208, the conservancy shall so notify the local public agency and shall authorize the agency to proceed with actions required to implement the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31210.

Costs of providing parks, open space, or other public areas and facilities may be included as project costs within coastal restoration areas, if they are designed to serve the residents of the restoration area and do not constitute a disproportionate share of the total project cost. Costs of providing public coastal access sites and scenic easements serving the public may be permitted as project costs where such features are part of a coastal restoration plan approved as provided in Section 31208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

31211.

The conservancy, local public agencies, and nonprofit organizations, in undertaking coastal restoration projects as provided in this chapter, shall be subject to the provisions of Division 24 (commencing with Section 33000) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 8.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31212.

Any funds over and above eligible project costs which remain after completion of a coastal restoration project as provided in this chapter shall be transmitted by the recipient to the state and deposited with the conservancy and shall be available for expenditure when appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the programs specified in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 9.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31213.

Where a local public agency is unable or unwilling to undertake restoration of any area, the conservancy may undertake the restoration or authorize a nonprofit organization to do so after notification to the local public agency, if a coastal restoration plan for the area has been prepared by the conservancy and approved as provided in Section 31208.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 10.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31213.5.

In the case of San Francisco Bay, the conservancy may undertake restoration of an area only upon formal request by resolution of a local public agency or the bay commission, except that, with respect to lands within Contra Costa County, such restoration or other action may be undertaken only upon the formal request by resolution of the local public agency having jurisdiction over such lands; provided, however, that a restoration plan for the area has been prepared by the conservancy and approved in accordance with Section 31208.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

31214.

A restoration plan prepared for a project to be carried out by the conservancy as provided in Section 31213, shall, before any lands are acquired or other implementation actions taken, be submitted to the local public agency which exercises land use regulation over the area of the proposed project. The local public agency shall have 90 days to review and comment on the proposed coastal restoration project. If, during that period, that local public agency or an appropriate nonprofit organization agrees to carry out the project within the guidelines established in the restoration plan, the conservancy may authorize the local public agency or nonprofit organization to carry out the restoration project, which shall then be subject to all provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 11.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31215.

Prior to undertaking any restoration project under the provisions of Section 31213, the project shall be included within, and funded under, the Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Integrated Coastal and Marine Resources Protection [31220. - 31220.]

31220.

(a) In order to improve and protect coastal and marine water quality and habitats, the conservancy may undertake coastal watershed and coastal and marine habitat water quality, sediment management, and living marine resources protection and restoration projects or award grants for those projects, consistent with this chapter. Except for projects described in paragraph (7), (8), (9), or (10) of subdivision (b), the conservancy shall consult with the State Water Resources Control Board in the development of the project or grant to ensure consistency with Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 30915) of Division 20.4 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) The conservancy may undertake a project or award a grant for a project under this section only if the project does one or more of the following:

(1) Reduces contamination of waters within the coastal zone or marine waters.

(2) Protects or restores fish and wildlife habitat within coastal and marine waters and coastal watersheds, including, but not limited to, permit coordination projects for watershed restoration.

(3) Reduces threats to coastal and marine fish and wildlife.

(4) Reduces unnatural erosion and sedimentation of coastal watersheds or contributes to the reestablishment of natural erosion and sediment cycles.

(5) Provides for monitoring and mapping of coastal currents, marine habitats, and marine wildlife, in order to facilitate the protection and enhancement of resources within the coastal zone. A project considered under this paragraph shall be implemented in consultation with the Department of Fish and Game.

(6) Acquires, protects, and restores coastal wetlands, riparian areas, floodplains, and other sensitive watershed lands, including watershed lands draining to sensitive coastal or marine areas.

(7) Reduces the impact of population and economic pressures on coastal and marine resources.

(8) Provides for public access compatible with resource protection and restoration objectives.

(9) Provides for the construction or expansion of nature centers or research facilities that emphasize conservation education or research activities focusing on the marine portion of the coastal zone or the land and ocean interface.

(10) Provides for projects and activities consistent with Division 26.5 (commencing with Section 35500).

(c) Projects funded pursuant to this section shall include a monitoring and evaluation component and shall be consistent with the following, if available and relevant to the project:

(1) Integrated Watershed Management Program established pursuant to Section 30947.

(2) Local watershed management plans.

(3) Water quality control plans adopted by the State Water Resources Control Board and regional water quality control boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 383, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Coastal Resource Enhancement Projects [31251. - 31270.]

31251.

The conservancy may award grants to public agencies and nonprofit organizations for the purpose of enhancement of coastal resources that, because of indiscriminate dredging or filling, improper location of improvements, natural or human-induced events, or incompatible land uses, have suffered loss of natural and scenic values. Grants under this chapter shall be utilized for the assembly of parcels of land within coastal resource enhancement areas to improve resource management, for relocation of improperly located or designed improvements, and for other corrective measures that will enhance the natural and scenic character of the areas. As provided in this chapter, the cost of acquisition of certain lands within coastal resource enhancement areas may be funded through the conservancy. Grants under this section may not be utilized as a method of acquisition of public park, wildlife, or natural areas, except as those uses may be incidental to a coastal resource enhancement project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31251.2.

(a) In order to enhance the natural or scenic character of coastal resources within the coastal zone, the conservancy may undertake a project or award a grant, consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 30200 and pursuant to this chapter, to enhance a watershed resource that is partly outside of the coastal zone. Any of these projects or grants which involve the management of fish shall be approved by the Department of Fish and Game.

Neither the conservancy nor any other state agency shall undertake a project affecting an area partly inside and partly outside the coastal zone under this chapter, except at the request of the local public agency or agencies having jurisdiction over the entire project area.

(b) Any enhancement activity carried out pursuant to this section shall not be subject to any commission review, as set forth in Section 31258, for that portion of the activity located outside the coastal zone. However, the commission through its executive director and the Department of Fish and Game may review and comment on the enhancement plan’s consistency with the policies and objectives of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000).

(c) No funds set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 5096.151 of the Public Resources Code, shall be expended on enhancement activities that are outside the coastal zone.

(d) This section shall not apply to any portion of the Santa Monica Mountains Zone as set forth in Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1551, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

31252.

All areas proposed for resource enhancement by a state agency, local public agency, or nonprofit organization shall be identified in a certified local coastal plan or program as requiring public action to resolve existing or potential resource protection problems or shall be so identified in other local plans which the commission determines to be consistent with the policies and objectives of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000). In the case of San Francisco Bay, the lands shall be so identified in the bay plan, the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan, or in any other local plan which the bay commission determines to be consistent with such plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 13.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31253.

The conservancy may provide up to the total of the cost of any coastal resource enhancement project, including the state or local share of federally supported projects. The amount of funding provided by the conservancy shall be determined by the total amount of funding available for coastal resource enhancement projects, the fiscal resources of the applicant, the urgency of the project relative to other eligible coastal resource enhancement projects, and the application of other factors prescribed by the conservancy for the purpose of determining project eligibility and priority in order to more effectively carry out the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31254.

The conservancy shall request the commission, local public agencies, nonprofit organizations, and other public and private groups to assist in the development of criteria and guidelines for the submission, evaluation, and determination of priority of coastal resource enhancement projects. After considering comments received from such sources and ensuring that adequate opportunity for public review and comment has been provided, the conservancy shall adopt guidelines and criteria for the administration of the coastal program authorized under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 14.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31255.

In accordance with procedures adopted by the conservancy, state agencies, local public agencies, and nonprofit organizations may submit proposed coastal resource enhancement projects for consideration by the conservancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 15.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31255.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the conservancy may enter into an option to acquire an interest in real property in connection with an enhancement project, when the Legislature appropriates funds for purposes of carrying out the objectives of this division. The cost of the option may not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31257.

In connection with proposed coastal resource enhancement projects, the conservancy may fund up to three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) of the cost of preparing coastal resource enhancement plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31258.

(a) Following the completion of a coastal resource enhancement plan, the conservancy shall forward the plan to the commission for determination of conformity of the plan with the policies and objectives of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000). The commission shall have 60 days to review the project and transmit the findings on the plan to the conservancy. If no comments are received within the period, the restoration plan shall be deemed to be in accord with Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000).

(b) (1) Following the certification of a local coastal program, the city, county, or city and county with jurisdiction over the certified area, rather than the commission, shall review the coastal resource enhancement plan if all of the following circumstances apply:

(A) The proposed enhancement plan will be implemented entirely within one local public agency’s jurisdiction.

(B) The area proposed for enhancement is identified pursuant to Section 31251.

(C) Implementation of the enhancement plan does not require an amendment to the certified local coastal program.

(2) The local public agency shall review the enhancement plan to determine consistency with the certified local coastal program within 60 days after transmittal of the plan from the conservancy and shall transmit its findings to the conservancy immediately upon completion of plan review. If no comments are received at the end of the 60-day period, the plan shall be deemed to be in accord with the provisions of the certified local coastal program.

(c) If the enhancement plan will be implemented in whole or in part in an area in which the commission retains coastal development permit jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30519, in which two or more local governments have jurisdiction, or where a local coastal program amendment is required to implement the plan, the commission shall be responsible for enhancement plan review and shall conduct the review in the following manner. The commission shall review the enhancement plan for consistency with the policies and objectives of Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000), as provided in subdivision (a), for the area subject to retained coastal development permit jurisdiction pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30519 and where a local coastal program amendment is required, and shall review the plan for consistency with certified local coastal programs for areas under local government coastal development permit jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 596.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

31258.5.

In the case of San Francisco Bay projects, the conservancy shall forward a coastal resource enhancement plan to the bay commission for determination of conformity with the bay plan, and, where relevant, with the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan. The bay commission shall have 60 days to review the plan and transmit its findings on such plan to the conservancy. If no comments are received within such period, the resource enhancement plan shall be deemed to be in accord with the bay plan, and, where relevant, the Suisun Marsh Protection Plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

31259.

Following review and approval of a resource enhancement plan as provided in Section 31258, the conservancy shall so notify the agency and shall authorize the agency to proceed with actions required to implement the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31260.

As part of an approved coastal resource enhancement project, the conservancy may fund the costs of land acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 958, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

31261.

Private development may be permitted within the area of the coastal resource enhancement projects, where such development is compatible with the primary objectives of resource protection and enhancement of the coastal zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31262.

Any funds over and above eligible project costs which remain after completion of a resource enhancement project as provided in this chapter shall be transmitted to the state and be deposited with the conservancy and shall be available for expenditure when appropriated by the Legislature for the purposes of funding the programs specified in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1441.)
-------------------------------------------

31263.

If a local public agency or state agency is unable or unwilling to undertake improvement of a deteriorating area, the conservancy may undertake the coastal resource enhancement or authorize a nonprofit organization to do so after notification to the local public agency, if a coastal resource enhancement plan for the area has been prepared by the conservancy and approved as provided in Section 31258.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 67, Sec. 16.   Effective February 28, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

31263.5.

In the case of San Francisco Bay, the conservancy may undertake resource enhancement of an area only upon formal request by resolution of a local public agency or the bay commission, except that, with respect to lands within Contra Costa County, such resource enhancement or other action may be undertaken only upon the formal request by resolution of the local public agency having jurisdiction over such lands; provided, however, that a resource enhancement plan has been prepared and approved as provided in Section 31258.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 967, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

31264.
